Utah statutes.
59-1-1418.   Suspension of running of statute of limitations.

(1)  The time period allowed for making an assessment or commencing a proceeding under Section 59-1-1410 shall be extended by the time period during which the commission is prohibited by law from making an assessment or commencing a proceeding for collection, plus 60 days.

(2)  The time period allowed for commencing a proceeding under Section 59-1-1410 shall be extended by the time period during which the commencement of the proceeding is stayed by injunction or statutory prohibition.



Enacted by Chapter 212, 2009 General Session

